test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ueue29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - üü: # Noun (29) üü 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
    üü+N+Sg+Nom: üü
    üü+N+Sg+Gen: üü
    üü+N+Sg+Par: üüd
    üü+N+Sg+Ill: [üühte, üühe, üüde]
    üü+N+Sg+Ine: [üün, üüh, üühn]
    üü+N+Sg+Ela: üüst
    üü+N+Sg+All: üüle
    üü+N+Sg+Ade: üül
    üü+N+Sg+Abl: üült
    üü+N+Sg+Tra: üüs
    üü+N+Sg+Ter: üüniq
    üü+N+Sg+Abe: üüldäq
    üü+N+Sg+Com: üügaq
    üü+N+Pl+Nom: üüq
    üü+N+Pl+Gen: öie
    üü+N+Pl+Par: öid
    üü+N+Pl+Ill: [öihte, öiehte]
    üü+N+Pl+Ine: [öin, öih, öihn, öien, öieh, öiehn]
    üü+N+Pl+Ela: [öist, öiest]
    üü+N+Pl+All: [öile, öiele]
    üü+N+Pl+Ade: [öil, öiel]
    üü+N+Pl+Abl: [öilt, öielt]
    üü+N+Pl+Tra: [öis, öies]
    üü+N+Pl+Ter: öieniq
    üü+N+Pl+Abe: [öildäq, öieldäq]
    üü+N+Pl+Com: öiegaq
